src/fst/morphology/stems/enclitics.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   CL lexicons start     !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON EncliticRoot
enCLBoundary ;
# ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        enCLitic         !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON enCL
+CL%/ADVConj%/dash:sh # ;
+CL%/PCDisc%/go:gow2 # ;
+CL%/PCDisc%/sa:saw2 # ;


LEXICON enCLBoundary
0:- enCL ;
